Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB794.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 508(a) and (c) of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 508. Municipal Certificate Required Prior to Payment of Fire Loss Claims.--(a) No insurance company, association or exchange doing business in this Commonwealth shall pay a claim of a named insured for fire damage to a structure located within a municipality where the amount recoverable for the fire loss to 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 the structure under all policies exceeds [seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500)] eighteen thousand dollars ($18,000) unless the insurance company, association or exchange is furnished with a certificate pursuant to subsection (b) of this section and unless there is compliance with the procedures set forth in subsections (c) and (d) of this section.* * *(c) When the loss agreed to between the named insured and the company, association or exchange equals or exceeds sixty per centum (60%) of the aggregate limits of liability on all fire policies covering the building or other structure, the insurance company, association or exchange shall transfer from the insurance proceeds to the designated officer of the municipality in the aggregate [two thousand dollars ($2,000)] four thousand dollars ($4,000) for each fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) and each fraction of that amount of a claim, or, if at the time of a loss report the named insured has submitted a contractor's signed estimate of the costs of removing, repairing or securing the building or other structure in an amount less than the amount calculated under the foregoing transfer formula, the insurance company, association or exchange shall transfer from the insurance proceeds the amount specified in the estimate. The transfer of proceeds shall be on a pro rata basis by all companies, associations or exchanges insuring the building or other structure. Policy proceeds remaining after the transfer to the municipality shall be disbursed in accordance with the policy terms. The named insured may submit a contractor's signed estimate of the costs of removing, repairing or securing the building or other structure after the transfer, and the designated officer shall return the amount of the fund in excess 20250SB0794PN0869 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the estimate to the named insured if the municipality has not commenced to remove, repair or secure the building or other structure. This subsection only applies to municipalities that have adopted an ordinance authorizing the procedure described in subsections (c) and (d) of this section and applies only to fire losses that occur after the adoption of the ordinance. The ordinance shall designate the officer authorized to carry out the duties of this section.(c.1) A policyholder shall, within one year of receiving funds under this section, report to the governing board of the municipality how the funds are being utilized and a timeline for action on the remaining funds. The report under this subsection shall include all supporting documents detailing the precise spending of funds for the purpose for which the claim was made. The following shall apply:(1) Following the issuance of the report of the policyholder to the governing board, the governing board shall, pending a majority vote of members present in accordance to quorum guidelines, approve the timeline for the execution of remaining funds. If the governing board does not approve the timeline, the policyholder must establish a new timeline for the execution of remaining funds pending approval from the governing board.(2) If the timeline for the execution of remaining funds by the policyholder is not met, the governing board may, pending a majority vote of members present in accordance to quorum guidelines, approve a new timeline as proposed by the policyholder or may confiscate the funds to be deposited into a special fund used solely for the purpose of financing the original purpose of the claim.20250SB0794PN0869 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) If after one year the policyholder fails to report to the governing board of the municipality the progress that has been made with funds allocated to the policyholder, the municipality shall, pending a majority vote of members present in accordance to quorum guidelines, confiscate the funds to be deposited into a special fund used solely for the purpose of financing the original purpose of the claim.(c.2) For all existing funds held by a current policyholder, the requirements of subsection (c.1)(1) and (2) shall apply.* * *(d.1) If a municipality does not have an auditor or if the municipal auditor has a conflict of interest in auditing escrow funds, the responsibility for auditing funds under this section shall be the responsibility of the respective county auditor.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0794PN0869 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516